src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VINFINITES_UADDID   !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Inf:i%>đ K ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:i^WG K ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Use/NG:e^WG K ;
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:á%>m K ;
+Cond+Prs+ConNeg:á^WG%>ččii K ;
+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:á^WG%>á K ;
+Imprt+ConNeg: K ;
+PrsPrc:e%>e K ;
+PrfPrc:á%>m K ;
+PrfPrc+Err/Orth:â2%>m K ;
+Der2+Der/NomAg:e C_TAHHEE ;

+VAbess:e^WG VABESS ;
+VAbess+Use/NG:i^WG VABESS ;
+VGen:i^WG%>n VGEN ;

+Actio+Nom:i%>m NOMACT ;
+Actio+Ill:i^CSH%>mân K ;
+Actio+Loc:i^CSH%>mist K ;
+Actio+Com:i^CSH%>máin K ;
+Actio+Ess:i^CSH%>min K ;
+Ger+PxSg1:i^WG%>dijnân K ;
+Ger+PxSg1+Err/Orth:e^WG%>dijnân K ;
+Ger+PxSg2:i^WG%>dijnâd K ;
+Ger+PxSg2+Err/Orth:e^WG%>dijnâd K ;
+Ger+PxSg3+Err/Orth:i^WG%>dijnes K ;
+Ger+PxSg3:i^WG%>dijnis K ;
+Ger+PxSg3+Err/Orth:e^WG%>dijnis K ;
+Ger:i^WG%>dijn K ;
+Ger+Err/Orth:e^WG%>dijn K ;
+Der4+Der/NomAct:i%>m FLAG_3HUKSIM ;

LEXICON EVEN_IND_UADDID   !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Prs+Sg1:á^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>m K ;   ! kästiđ
+Prs+Sg2:á^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>h K ;   ! kästiđ
+Prs+Sg3:á^CSH^VHIGH K ;
+Prs+Du1:e^CLEN%>en K ;
+Prs+Du2:i^CSH%>vettee K ;
+Prs+Du3:i%>v K ;
+Prs+Pl1:i%>p K ;
+Prs+Pl2:i^CSH%>vetteđ K ;
+Prs+Pl3:i^CSH%>h K ;
+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:i%>h K ;

+Prt+Sg1:i^VBACK%>m K ; ! uáđđi^VBACK>m : oođđ0>im
+Prt+Sg2:i^VBACK%>h K ;
+Prt+Sg3:i^WG^VBACK%>j K ;
+Prt+Du1:i^WG^VBACK%>jm K ;
+Prt+Du2:i^WG^VBACK%>jd K ;
+Prt+Du3:i^WG^VBACK%>jn K ;
+Prt+Pl1:i^WG^VBACK%>jm K ;
+Prt+Pl2:i^WG^VBACK%>jd K ;
+Prt+Pl3:i^VBACK^RVSH%>i3 K ;

LEXICON EVEN_POT_UADDID !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg1:e^WG%>em K ;
+Sg2:e^WG%>eh K ;
+Sg3:i^WG^VBACK%>š K ;
+Du1:i^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>žeen K ;
+Du2:i^WG^VBACK%>švettee K ;
+Du3:i^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>žává K ;
+Pl1:i^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>žep K ;
+Pl2:i^WG^VBACK%>švetteđ K ;
+Pl3:i^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>žeh K ;

LEXICON EVEN_IMPRT_UADDID   !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg2:e^WG K ;
+Sg2+Use/NG:i^WG K ;
+Sg3:u^WG%>s K ;
+Du1:o^CLEN%>on K ;
+Du2:e^CLEN%>e K ;
+Du3:u^CLEN%>s K ;
+Pl1:u^CLEN^VHIGH%>p K ;
+Pl2:i%>đ K ;
+Pl3:u^CLEN%>s K ;

LEXICON 2SYLL_UAINID_TV  !!= * __@CODE@__  5 verbs
+V+TV:  VINFINITES_UAINID ;
+V+TV+Ind: EVEN_IND_UAINID ;
+V+TV+Cond+Prs:á^WG%> EVEN_COND ;
+V+TV+Pot+Prs: EVEN_POT_UAINID ;
+V+TV+Imprt: EVEN_IMPRT_UAINID ;
+V+TV+Der4+Der/InchL:i^WG%>škyett4 4SYLL_KYETTID_DER ;
+V+TV+Der1+Der/st:ist^WG 3_DERIVED ; !uáinistiđ
+V+TV+Der1+Der/tt:itt^WG 3_DERIVED ; !
!DERL+V+TV+Der1+Der/l:âl 3_DERIVED_L ;
+V+TV:á DER_MAS ;
+V+TV+Der3+Der/Pass:u2^CLEN C_PASS_SH ; ! poldum uástoo

LEXICON VINFINITES_UAINID  !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Inf:i%>đ K ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:i^WG K ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Err/Orth:e^WG K ;
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:á%>m K ;
+Cond+Prs+ConNeg:á^WG%>ččii K ;
+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:á^WG%>á K ;
+Imprt+ConNeg: K ;
+PrsPrc:e%>e K ;
+PrfPrc:á%>m K ;
+PrfPrc+Err/Orth:â2%>m K ;
+Der2+Der/NomAg:e C_TAHHEE ;

+VAbess:i^WG VABESS ;
+VGen:i^WG%>n VGEN ;

+Actio+Nom:i%>m NOMACT ;
+Actio+Ill:i%>mân K ;
+Actio+Loc:i%>mist K ;
+Actio+Com:i%>máin K ;
+Actio+Ess:i%>min K ;
+Ger+PxSg1:i^WG%>dijnân K ;
+Ger+PxSg2:i^WG%>dijnâd K ;
+Ger+PxSg3+Err/Orth:i^WG%>dijnes K ;
+Ger+PxSg3:i^WG%>dijnis K ;
+Ger:i^WG%>dijn K ;
+Ger:e^WG%>dijn K ;
+Der4+Der/NomAct:i%>m FLAG_3HUKSIM ;

LEXICON EVEN_IND_UAINID   !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Prs+Sg1:á^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>m K ;   ! uáinám
+Prs+Sg2:á^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>h K ;   !
+Prs+Sg3:á^VHIGH K ;
+Prs+Du1:e^CLEN%>en K ;
+Prs+Du2:i%>vettee K ;
+Prs+Du3:i%>v K ;
+Prs+Pl1:i%>p K ;
+Prs+Pl2:i%>vetteđ K ;
+Prs+Pl3:i%>h K ;

+Prt+Sg1:i^VBACK^RVSH%>m K ; ! oinim
+Prt+Sg2:i^VBACK^RVSH%>h K ; !oinih
+Prt+Sg3:i^WG^VBACK%>j K ;
+Prt+Du1:i^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>jm K ;
+Prt+Du2:i^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>jd K ;
+Prt+Du3:i^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>jn K ;
+Prt+Pl1:i^WG^VBACK%>jm K ;
+Prt+Pl2:i^WG^VBACK%>jd K ;
+Prt+Pl3:i^VBACK^RVSH%>i3 K ;

LEXICON EVEN_POT_UAINID !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg1:e^WG%>em K ;
+Sg2:e^WG%>eh K ;
+Sg3:i^WG^VBACK%>š K ;
+Du1:i^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>žeen K ;
+Du2:i^WG^VBACK%>švettee K ;
+Du3:i^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>žává K ;
+Pl1:i^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>žep K ;
+Pl2:i^WG^VBACK%>švetteđ K ;
+Pl3:i^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>žeh K ;

LEXICON EVEN_IMPRT_UAINID   !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg2+Err/Orth:e^WG K ;
+Sg2:i^WG K ;
+Sg3:u^WG%>s K ;
+Du1:o^CLEN%>on K ;
+Du2:e^CLEN%>e K ;
+Du3:u^CLEN%>s K ;
+Pl1:u^CLEN^VHIGH%>p K ;
+Pl2:i%>đ K ;
+Pl3:u^CLEN%>s K ;


LEXICON 2SYLL_CAALLID !!= * __@CODE@__  7 verbs
+V: 2SYLL_CAALLID_V ;
LEXICON 2SYLL_CAALLID_IV
+V+IV: 2SYLL_CAALLID_V ;
LEXICON 2SYLL_CAALLID_TV
+V+TV: 2SYLL_CAALLID_V ;

LEXICON 2SYLL_CAALLID_V  !!= * __@CODE@__ 7 verbs
:  VINFINITES_CAALLID ;
+Ind: EVEN_IND_CAALLID ;
+Cond+Prs:á^WG^VHIGH^RVSH%> EVEN_COND ;
+Pot+Prs: EVEN_POT_CAALLID ;
+Imprt: EVEN_IMPRT_CAALLID ;
+Der4+Der/InchL:i^WG%>škyett4 4SYLL_KYETTID_DER ;
+Der1+Der/st:ist^WG 3_DERIVED ; !čälistiđ OBS! čä^RVlist vs čäällist
+Der1+Der/tt:itt^WG 3_DERIVED ; !čälittiđ OBS! čä^čä^RVlitt vs čäällist
!+V+Der1+Der/d:âd^WG 3_DERIVED ;  ! no Der/d for ID
!DERL+Der1+Der/l:il 3_DERIVED_L ;
:á^CSH^RVSH DER_MAS ;
+Der3+Der/Pass:u2 C_PASS_SH_RVSH ; !

LEXICON VINFINITES_CAALLID   !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Inf:i%>đ K ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:i^WG^RLEN K ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Use/NG:e^WG^RVSH K ;
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:á^VHIGH%>m K ;  !
+Cond+Prs+ConNeg:á^WG^VHIGH^RVSH%>čč%>ii K ;
+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:á^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>á K ;
+Imprt+ConNeg: K ;
+PrsPrc:e^RVSH%>e K ;
+PrfPrc:á^VHIGH%>m K ;  !
+PrfPrc+Err/Orth:â^VHIGH%>m K ;  ! Perhaps for others as well
!+Der2+Der/NomAg:e^RVSH%> C_TAHHEE ;

+VAbess:i^WG^RVSH VABESS ;
+VGen:i^WG^RLEN%>n VGEN ;

+Actio+Nom:i%>m NOMACT ;
+Actio+Ill:i^CSH^RVSH%>mân K ;
+Actio+Loc:i^CSH^RVSH%>mist K ;
+Actio+Com:i^CSH^RVSH%>máin K ;
+Actio+Ess:i^CSH^RVSH%>min K ;
+Ger+PxSg1:i^WG^RVSH%>dijnân K ;
+Ger+PxSg2:i^WG^RVSH%>dijnâd K ;
+Ger+PxSg3+Err/Orth:i^WG^RVSH%>dijnes K ;
+Ger+PxSg3:i^WG^RVSH%>dijnis K ;
+Ger:i^WG^RVSH%>dijn K ;
+Der4+Der/NomAct:i%>m FLAG_3HUKSIM ;


LEXICON EVEN_IND_CAALLID   !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Prs+Sg1:á^WG^VHIGH^RVSH%>m K ;
+Prs+Sg2:á^WG^VHIGH^RVSH%>h K ;
+Prs+Sg3:á^CSH^VHIGH K ;
+Prs+Du1:e^CLEN^RVSH%>en K ;
+Prs+Du2:i^CSH^RVSH%>vettee K ;
+Prs+Du3:i%>v K ;
+Prs+Pl1:i%>p K ;
+Prs+Pl2:i^CSH^RVSH%>vetteđ K ;
+Prs+Pl3:i^CSH%>h K ;
+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:i%>h K ;

+Prt+Sg1:i^VBACK%>m K ;
+Prt+Sg2:i^VBACK%>h K ;
+Prt+Sg3:i^WG^VBACK%>j K ;        ! XX aä
+Prt+Du1:i^WG^VBACK%>jm K ;
+Prt+Du2:i^WG^VBACK%>jd K ;
+Prt+Du3:i^WG^VBACK%>jn K ;
+Prt+Pl1:i^WG^VBACK%>jm K ;
+Prt+Pl2:i^WG^VBACK%>jd K ;
+Prt+Pl3:i^VBACK^RVSH%>i3 K ;

LEXICON EVEN_POT_CAALLID !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg1:e^WG%>em K ;
+Sg2:e^WG%>eh K ;
+Sg3:i^WG^VBACK%>š K ;
+Du1:i^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>žeen K ;
+Du2:i^WG^VBACK%>švettee K ;
+Du3:i^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>žává K ;
+Pl1:i^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>žep K ;
+Pl2:i^WG^VBACK%>švetteđ K ;
+Pl3:i^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>žeh K ;

LEXICON EVEN_IMPRT_CAALLID !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg2:i^WG K ;
+Sg2+Use/NG:e^WG^RVSH K ;
+Sg3:u^WG^VHIGH%>s K ;
+Du1:o^VHIGH^RVSH%>on K ;
+Du2:e^RVSH%>e K ;
+Du3:u^VHIGH%>s K ;
+Pl1:u^VHIGH%>p K ;
+Pl2:i%>đ K ;
+Pl3:u^VHIGH%>s K ;

!LEXICON JUAVVID !  __@CODE@__ incomplete paradigm, to be fixed
!! as 2SYLL_ID, but only 3 person
!+V+Inf:i%>đ K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:ám K ; ! XXX fix
!+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Err/Orth:âm K ; ! XXX fix
!+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg:ččii K ;
!+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:á%>á K ;
!+V+Imprt+ConNeg: K ;
!
!+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:á^CSH^VHIGH K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:â^WG%>i K ;
!+V+Cond+Prs:i^WG%> EVEN_COND ;
!+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3:i%>š K ;
!+V+Imprt: EVEN_IMPRT_ID ;


LEXICON 2SYLL_ID
+V: 2SYLL_ID_V ;
LEXICON 2SYLL_ID_IV
+V+IV: 2SYLL_ID_V ;
LEXICON 2SYLL_ID_TV
+V+TV: 2SYLL_ID_V ;

LEXICON 2SYLL_ID_V
: VINFINITES_ID ;
+Ind: EVEN_IND_ID ;
+Cond+Prs:á^WG^VHIGH%> EVEN_COND ; !
+Pot+Prs: EVEN_POT_ID ;
+Imprt: EVEN_IMPRT_ID ;
+Der4+Der/InchL:i^WG^RVSH%>škyett4 4SYLL_KYETTID_DER ; !vyelgiškuođij kevtiškyettiđ rähtiškyettiđ
+Der1+Der/st:ist^WG 3_DERIVED ; !
+Der1+Der/tt:itt^WG 3_DERIVED ; !
!+Der1+Der/d:âd^WG 3_DERIVED ; !juovâd vs jyeh^RCâd  ! no Der/d for ID
!DERL+Der1+Der/l:il 3_LEKKASID ; !vyerdiliđ vyerd väzziliđ
:á^CSH DER_MAS ;
+Der3+Der/Pass:u2 C_PASS_SH_RVSH ; !lovdum  jyeh^RC: juohhuđ ! juohhuđ
