src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
celkkiđ:ce^RVlkk4 2SYLL_ID_TV ; ! celkkih !YAML
cevziđ:ce^RVvz 2SYLL_ID_IV ;
cuákkiđ:cuákk4 2SYLL_ID ;
cuálkkiđ:cuálkk4 2SYLL_ID ;
cäimiđ:cä^RVi4m 2SYLL_ID_TV ;
eeijiđ:eei4j 2SYLL_ID ;
estiđ:e^RVst 2SYLL_ID_TV ;
fiettiđ+v2:fiett 2SYLL_ID ;
härdiđ:hä^RVrd 2SYLL_ID ;
hästiđ:hä^RVst 2SYLL_ID_TV ;
jeehiđ:jeeh^RC 2SYLL_ID ;
jiehiđ:jieh^RC 2SYLL_ID ;
juátkiđ:juátk4 2SYLL_UAINID_TV ;
järdiđ:jä^RVrd 2SYLL_ID_TV ;
jäämmiđ:jäämm 2SYLL_CAALLID_IV ;
keldiđ:ke^RVld 2SYLL_ID ;
kendiđ:ke^RVnd 2SYLL_ID ;
jiendiđ:jiend 2SYLL_ID ;
kevttiđ:ke^RVvtt 2SYLL_ID_TV ;
kieldiđ:kield 2SYLL_ID_TV ;
kieptiđ:kiept 2SYLL_ID_TV ;
kuálkkiđ:kuálkk4 2SYLL_UAINID_TV ;
kuárdiđ:kuárd 2SYLL_UAINID_TV ;
kyerdiđ:kyerd 2SYLL_ID ;
kyestiđ:kyest 2SYLL_ID ;
kähtiđ:kä^RVht4 2SYLL_ID "kaakattaa" ;
käidiđ:kä^RVi4d 2SYLL_ID ;
käskiđ:kä^RVsk 2SYLL_ID ;
käälliđ:kääll 2SYLL_CAALLID ;
lemniđ:le^RVmn 2SYLL_ID_TV ;
luovâscelkkiđ:luovâs#ce^RVlkk4 2SYLL_ID ;
luáptiđ:luápt 2SYLL_ID ;
luávdiđ:luávd 2SYLL_UAINID_TV ;
luávkkiđ:luávkk 2SYLL_ID ; ! XXX
läittiđ:lä^RVi4tt 2SYLL_ID_TV ;
läppiđ:lä^RVpp 2SYLL_ID_TV ; ! XXX ä
meddiđ:me^RVdd 2SYLL_ID_TV ;
meeđđiđ:meeđđ 2SYLL_ID ; 
meidiđ:me^RVi4d 2SYLL_ID_TV ;
mestiđ:me^RVst 2SYLL_ID ;
mettiđ:me^RVtt 2SYLL_ID ;
muáittiđ:muái4tt 2SYLL_ID_TV ;
muárdiđ:muárd 2SYLL_UAINID_TV ;
mäksiđ:mä^RVk4s 2SYLL_ID_TV ;
mälttiđ:mä^RVltt 2SYLL_ID_IV ;
mättiđ:mä^RVtt 2SYLL_ID_TV ;
neskiđ:ne^RVsk 2SYLL_ID ;
nevttiđ:ne^RVvtt 2SYLL_ID ;
njeeijiđ:njeei4j 2SYLL_ID ;
njeidiđ:nje^RVi4d 2SYLL_ID_TV ;
njepčiđ:nje^RVpč 2SYLL_ID ;
njäbbiđ:njä^RVbb 2SYLL_ID ;
nuástiđ:nuást 2SYLL_UAINID_TV ;
näittiđ:nä^RVi4tt 2SYLL_ID_TV ;
peggiđ:pe^RVgg 2SYLL_ID_IV ;
peittiđ:pe^RVi4tt 2SYLL_ID ;
pelkkiđ:pe^RVlkk4 2SYLL_ID_TV ;
pestiđ:pe^RVst 2SYLL_ID_TV ;
pettiđ:pe^RVtt 2SYLL_ID_TV ;
peškiđ:pe^RVšk 2SYLL_ID ;
puáldiđ:puáld 2SYLL_UAINID_TV ;
päiniđ:pä^RVi4n 2SYLL_ID_TV ;
päksiđ:pä^RVk4s 2SYLL_ID ;
pärdiđ:pä^RVrd 2SYLL_ID ;
pävkkiđ:pä^RVvkk4 2SYLL_ID_IV ;
pääđđiđ:pääđđ 2SYLL_CAALLID_TV ;
päštiđ:pä^RVšt 2SYLL_ID_IV ; ! ML; stem ok, päštih
repčiđ:re^RVpč 2SYLL_ID ;
restiđ:re^RVst 2SYLL_ID ;
reškiđ:re^RVšk 2SYLL_ID_IV ;
rähtiđ:rä^RVht4 2SYLL_ID_TV ;
rätkiđ:rä^RVtk4 2SYLL_ID ; ! XXX ä
räättiđ:räätt4 2SYLL_CAALLID ;
sajanmäksiđ:sajan#mä^RVk4s 2SYLL_ID ;
seđŋiđ:se^RVđŋ 2SYLL_ID ;
skeikkiđ:ske^RVi4kk4 2SYLL_ID ;
skuálkkiđ:skuálkk4 2SYLL_UAINID_TV ;
skuávkkiđ:skuávkk4 2SYLL_ID ; ! XXX
suáittiđ:suái4tt 2SYLL_UAINID_TV ;
suárdiđ:suárd 2SYLL_ID ;
suáđgiđ:suáđg 2SYLL_ID ;
syeldiđ:syeld 2SYLL_ID ;
sälbiđ:sä^RVlb 2SYLL_ID ; ! XXX
sättiđ:sä^RVtt 2SYLL_ID_IV ;
teddiđ:te^RVdd 2SYLL_ID_TV ;
terttiđ:te^RVrtt 2SYLL_ID ;
tevdiđ:te^RVvd 2SYLL_ID_TV ;
teŋkkiđ:te^RVŋkk 2SYLL_ID ;
tyelttiđ:tyeltt 2SYLL_ID ;
tyeppiđ:tyepp 2SYLL_ID ;
täiđiđ:tä^RVi4đ 2SYLL_ID_IV ;
uástiđ:uást 2SYLL_UAINID_TV ;
uđđâsistkevttiđ:uđđâsist#ke^RVvtt 2SYLL_ID ;
veddiđ:ve^RVdd 2SYLL_ID_TV ;
velttiđ:ve^RVltt 2SYLL_ID_TV ;
vestiđ:ve^RVst 2SYLL_ID ;
viettiđ+v2:viett 2SYLL_ID ; 
vuáláčäälliđ:vuálá#čääll 2SYLL_CAALLID ;
vyeksiđ:vyek4s 2SYLL_ID_IV ;
vyerdiđ:vyerd 2SYLL_ID_TV ;
vyetkiđ:vyetk4 2SYLL_ID ;
väidiđ:vä^RVi4d 2SYLL_ID_TV ;
väldiđ:vä^RVld 2SYLL_ID_TV ;
väättiđ:väätt4 2SYLL_CAALLID_TV ;
ähtiđ:ä^RVht 2SYLL_ID ;
älgiđ:ä^RVlg 2SYLL_ID_IV ;
ävttiđ:ä^RVvtt 2SYLL_ID ;
ääijiđ:ääi4j 2SYLL_CAALLID_TV ;
äštiđ:ä^RVšt 2SYLL_ID_TV ;
čuággiđ:čuágg 2SYLL_UAINID_TV ;
čuávdiđ:čuávd 2SYLL_UAINID_TV ;
čyeldiđ:čyeld 2SYLL_ID ;
čäittiđ:čä^RVi4tt 2SYLL_ID_TV ; ! ML, stem is ok
čäälliđ:čääll 2SYLL_CAALLID_TV ; !!YAML
šeštiđ:še^RVšt 2SYLL_ID_TV ;
šlettiđ:šle^RVtt 2SYLL_ID ;
šluákkiđ:šluákk4 2SYLL_ID_IV ;
špuákkiđ:špuákk4 2SYLL_ID ;
šyehkiđ:šyehk 2SYLL_ID_IV ;
